Massachusetts, session 194th, H1500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The second paragraph of section 3 of chapter 708 of the acts of 1966, as
most recently amended by section 55 of chapter 150 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “officiis,”, as appearing in section 5 of chapter 264 of the acts of 1982,
the following words:- an individual with expertise in affordable housing appointed by the senate
president, a representative of a labor union with expertise in housing issues appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives.
SECTION 2. The first sentence of clause (k) of section 4 of said chapter 708 is hereby
amended by inserting after the word “director” the following words:- for a term of not more than
8 years.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission of 3 individuals with expertise in affordable housing financing and
development created to conduct a performance review of Massachusetts Housing Finance
of 2

Agency's last 5 fiscal years to assess the agency's performance in the areas of affordable and low
income housing in gateway cities. One member shall be appointed by the Governor, 1 member
shall be appointed by the senate president and 1 member shall be appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives. The commission shall file a report and make recommendations as to
how the agency can generate more affordable and low income housing in gateway cities. The
commission shall commence the review within 30 days of the effective date of this act and shall
file the report and recommendations with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives
not later than 1 year following the commencement of the review.
of 2